Illinois, session 104th, HB3852.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Partial-Birth Abortion Ban Act of 2025. 6    Section 5. Findings; purposes.7    (a) The General Assembly finds that:8        (1) Partial-birth abortion is a gruesome and inhumane 9    procedure that is never medically necessary and, as such, 10    should be prohibited.11        (2) In 2003, the 108th United States Congress passed 12    the Partial-Birth Abortion Ban Act of 2003 (18 U.S.C. 13    1531), and President George W. Bush signed it into law.14        (3) Later, on April 18, 2007, the U.S. Supreme Court 15    upheld the Partial-Birth Abortion Ban Act of 2003 ("the 16    federal ban") in Gonzales v. Carhart, 550 U.S. 124 (2007), 17    specifically ruling that a ban on partial-birth abortion 18    need not include a maternal "health" exception to be 19    constitutional.20        (4) This Act's language stems from and uses as its 21    primary influence the language of the federal ban as 22    upheld in Gonzales v. Carhart.23        (5) This Act – a state ban on partial-birth abortion –   HB3852- 2 -LRB104 12285 JDS 22399 b1    is needed to supplement the federal ban. Importantly, the 2    federal ban was narrowly tailored to reach only those 3    partial-birth abortion procedures that implicate Congress' 4    power to regulate interstate or foreign commerce. U.S. 5    CONST. art. 1, 8, cl. 3. Without this Act, partial-birth 6    abortions performed, but not affecting these categories of 7    commerce, are not prohibited under the federal ban.8        (6) A partial-birth abortion poses serious risk to a 9    woman's long-term health.10        (7) There is a substantial evidentiary record upon 11    which the General Assembly has based its conclusion that a 12    maternal "health" exception is not constitutionality 13    required in a State ban on partial-birth abortion.14        (8) Moreover, the medical evidence clearly supports 15    the informed judgment of this State that a partial-birth 16    abortion is never medically necessary to preserve a 17    woman's health and instead poses serious health risks to 18    the woman.19        (9) Specifically, partial-birth abortion poses serious 20    risks, including, but not limited to: an increased risk of 21    cervical incompetence, as a result of cervical dilation, 22    that makes it difficult or impossible for a woman to 23    successfully carry a subsequent pregnancy to term; an 24    increased risk of uterine rupture, abruption, amniotic 25    fluid embolus, and trauma to the uterus, as a result of 26    converting the child to a footling breech position – a   HB3852- 3 -LRB104 12285 JDS 22399 b1    procedure which, according to a leading obstetrics 2    textbook, "there are very few, if any, indications for 3    other than for delivery of a second twin"; and a risk of 4    lacerations and secondary hemorrhaging, as a result of the 5    physician blindly forcing a sharp instrument into the base 6    of the unborn child's skull while he or she is lodged in 7    the birth canal – an act that could result in severe 8    bleeding and subsequent shock.9        (10) There is no credible medical evidence that 10    partial-birth abortions are safer than other abortion 11    procedures. No controlled studies of partial-birth 12    abortion have been conducted nor have any comparative 13    studies been conducted to demonstrate its safety and 14    efficacy compared to other abortion methods. Furthermore, 15    there have been no articles published in peer-reviewed 16    journals that establish that partial-birth abortions are 17    superior in any way to established abortion procedures.18        (11) In light of this overwhelming evidence, the State 19    has a compelling interest in prohibiting partial-birth 20    abortion. Planned Parenthood v. Casey, 505 U.S. 833 21    (1992), recognized a governmental interest in protecting 22    the life of a child during the birth process. This 23    interest is specifically implicated during a partial-birth 24    abortion because labor is induced and the birth process is 25    begun before an abortion is attempted or the child is 26    actually aborted.  HB3852- 4 -LRB104 12285 JDS 22399 b1        (12) In fact, partial-birth abortion kills a child who 2    is mere inches away from birth and being considered a 3    "person". Thus, this State clearly has a heightened 4    interest in protecting the life of the partially born 5    child.6        (13) The public's perception of the appropriate role 7    of a physician during a child's birth is undermined by 8    aborting a child in the manner that purposefully seeks to 9    kill the child inches from birth.10        (14) Partial-birth abortion is disturbingly similar to 11    the killing of a newborn infant and blurs the legal and 12    moral lines between infanticide and abortion. This Act 13    reinforces that line at birth while also preserving the 14    integrity of the medical profession and promoting respect 15    for human life.16        (15) The vast majority of infants killed during 17    partial-birth abortions are alive until the very end of 18    the procedure. Medical science has established that an 19    unborn child can feel pain when subjected to painful 20    stimuli like that inflicted during a partial-birth 21    abortion procedure. Moreover, fetal pain experts believe 22    that an unborn child's perception of pain can be even more 23    intense than that of newborn infants and older children 24    subjected to the same stimuli.25    (b) Based on the findings in subsection (a), the purposes 26of the General Assembly are to:  HB3852- 5 -LRB104 12285 JDS 22399 b1        (1) conclusively establish that partial-birth abortion 2    is never medically indicated to preserve the health of the 3    mother and instead poses significant maternal health 4    risks;5        (2) clearly define the line between abortion and 6    infanticide; and7        (3) safeguard the role of a physician during 8    childbirth. 9    Section 10. Definitions; terms.10    (a) As used in this Act, "partial-birth abortion" means an 11abortion in which the person performing the abortion:12        (1) deliberately and intentionally vaginally delivers 13    a living fetus until, in the case of a head-first 14    presentation, the entire fetal head is outside the body of 15    the mother, or, in the case of breech presentation, any 16    part of the fetal trunk past the navel is outside the body 17    of the mother, for the purpose of performing an overt act 18    that the person knows will kill the partially delivered 19    living fetus; and20        (2) performs the overt act, other than completion of 21    delivery, which kills the partially delivered living 22    fetus.23    (b) The terms "fetus" and "infant" are used 24interchangeably to refer to the biological offspring of human 25parents.   HB3852- 6 -LRB104 12285 JDS 22399 b1    Section 15. Partial-birth abortions prohibited. 2Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, any person who 3knowingly performs a partial-birth abortion and thereby kills 4a human fetus or infant is guilty of a Class 4 felony. A person 5shall only perform or induce a partial-birth abortion on a 6viable fetus if: (i) the person is a physician; (ii) the person 7has a documented referral from another physician not legally 8or financially affiliated with the person performing or 9inducing the abortion; (iii) both physicians determine that 10the life of the mother is endangered by a physical disorder, 11physical illness, or physical injury, including a 12life-endangering condition caused by or arising from the 13pregnancy itself; and (iv) there is no other medical procedure 14that would suffice for that purpose. 15    Section 20. Civil action. The maternal grandparents of the 16fetus or infant, if the mother has not attained the age of 18 17years at the time of the abortion, may obtain, in a civil 18action, appropriate relief unless the pregnancy resulted from 19the plaintiff's criminal conduct or the plaintiff consented to 20the abortion. The relief shall include money damages for all 21injuries, psychological and physical, occasioned by the 22violation of this Act and statutory damages equal to 3 times 23the cost of the partial-birth abortion.   HB3852- 7 -LRB104 12285 JDS 22399 b1    Section 25. Prosecution of woman prohibited. A woman on 2whom a partial-birth abortion is performed may not be 3prosecuted under this Act, for a conspiracy to violate this 4Act, or for an offense under Article 31 of the Criminal Code of 52012 based on a violation of this Act, nor may she be held 6accountable under Article 5 of the Criminal Code of 2012 for an 7offense based on a violation of this Act. 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 9becoming law.